Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 75. Licensing and Control of Dogs.

Sec. 18.75.010.
Extension of dog control ordinances.
[Repealed, § 9 ch 109 SLA 1966.]

Secs. 18.75.020 — 18.75.030.
Dog tags; enforcement.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 18.75.040.
[Renumbered as AS 03.55.070.]

Secs. 18.75.050 — 18.75.060.
Enforcement; exemption. [Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]